Arkansas, session 2025, HB1796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-16-1104 is amended to read as follows:
27-16-1104. Minimum document requirements — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Applicant” means a person who has applied to the Office
of Driver Services for issuance or renewal of an Arkansas driver’s license or
identification card.
(B) “Applicant” includes without limitation a person who
has applied to the Office of Driver Services for an amendment of gender
information contained on the person’s Arkansas driver’s license or
identification card under subsection (d) of this section;
(2) “Gender information” means the sex of an applicant as stated
on the applicant’s identity document; and
(3) “Identity document” means an applicant’s:
(A) Original birth certificate;
(B) Amended birth certificate;
(C) Passport; or
*MBM092*
03/14/2025 1:37:32 PM MBM092

HB1796
(D) Identification document issued by the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
(b) To meet the requirements of this subchapter, the Office of Driver
Services shall include at a minimum the following information and features on
each driver's license and identification card that it issues to a person an
applicant:
(1) The person's applicant’s full legal name;
(2) The person's applicant’s date of birth;
(3) The person's applicant’s gender information;
(4) The person's applicant’s driver's license or identification
card number;
(5) A digital photograph of the person applicant;
(6) The person's applicant’s address of residence;
(7) The person's applicant’s signature;
(8) Physical security features designed to prevent tampering,
counterfeiting, or duplication of the document for fraudulent purposes; and
(9) A common machine-readable technology with defined minimum
data elements.
(c)(1) A driver’s license or identification card issued by the Office
of Driver Services shall state the applicant’s gender information as “M” for
male or “F” for female.
(2) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(4) of this section,
a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Office of Driver
Services shall contain the same gender information as stated on the
applicant’s identity document.
(3) The Office of Driver Services shall not issue a driver’s
license or identification card that contains:
(A) Gender information stated as “X”; or
(B) No gender information.
(4)(A) If an applicant provides an identity document with an
application for a driver’s license or identification card that contains no
gender information or gender information stated as “X”, the applicant shall
state the applicant’s gender information as “M” for male or “F” for female on
a form provided by the Office of Driver Services.
(B)(i) The applicant’s driver’s license or identification
card issued or renewed by the Office of Driver Services shall state the same
03/14/2025 1:37:32 PM MBM092

HB1796
gender information as the form completed by the applicant under subdivision
(c)(4)(A) of this section.
(ii) The applicant may subsequently amend the gender
information contained on the applicant’s driver’s license or identification
card by submitting the form and documentation required under subsection (d)
of this section.
(5) If the applicant provides an identity document with an
application for a driver’s license or identification card that contains no
gender information or gender information stated as “X” and does not provide
the Office of Driver Services the completed form required under subdivision
(c)(4)(A) of this section, the Office of Driver Services shall not issue a
driver’s license or identification card to the applicant.
(d)(1) On a form provided by the Office of Driver Services, an
applicant may request the Office of Driver Services amend the gender
information contained on the applicant’s driver’s license or identification
card.
(2) The applicant shall submit with the form an original or
certified copy of an amended birth certificate issued by:
(A) The Department of Health under § 20-18-307; or
(B) The vital records office of another state or
governmental agency.
(3)(A) The Office of Driver Services shall not grant an
application for a change of gender information unless the applicant:
(i) Completes the form provided under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section; and
(ii) Submits the documentation required by
subdivision (d)(2) of this section.
(B) If the Office of Driver Services approves the
application for an amendment of gender information, the Office of Driver
Services may issue to the applicant an amended duplicate:
(i) Driver’s license upon the payment of the fee
under § 27-16-806, provided that the applicant’s driving privileges are not
currently suspended or revoked; or
(ii) Identification card upon the payment of the fee
provided under § 27-16-805.
(4) If the Office of Driver Services denies an application to
03/14/2025 1:37:32 PM MBM092

HB1796
amend gender information submitted under this section, the Office of Driver
Services shall state its reasons for the denial in writing and forward a copy
of the denial to the applicant via first class mail.
(5) If a driver’s license or identification card record has been
amended under this section, the driver’s license or identification card shall
contain the person’s amended gender information upon the:
(A) Renewal of the driver’s license or identification
card; or
(B) Issuance of a duplicate driver’s license or
identification card.
(e)(1) If the records of the Office of Driver Services contain a
record of an unexpired driver’s license or identification card that has been
issued with gender information stated as “X”, the Office of Driver Services
may amend the person’s record to reflect gender information as “M” for male
or “F” for female to correspond to the identity document records of the
person kept by the Office of Driver Services.
(2) If the Office of Driver Services amends the gender
information contained within a person’s driver’s license or identification
card record under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, the Office of Driver
Services shall notify the person in writing via first class mail.
















03/14/2025 1:37:32 PM MBM092